New York, session 2025-2026, A11265.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 the assessor of the county of Rockland is hereby authorized to accept 3 from Simcray Holdings, LLC., an application for exemption from real 4 property taxes pursuant to section 420-a and section 462 of the real 5 property tax law with respect to the 2023, 2024 and 2025 assessment 6 rolls, and all of 2023-2024, 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 school taxes for 7 the parcel conveyed to such organization, with such parcel being located 8 at 307 South Pascack Road, in the village of Spring Valley, in the town 9 of Clarkstown, otherwise known as Rockland county tax map section 63.11, 10 block 1, lot 4. If accepted, the application shall be reviewed as if it 11 had been received on or before the taxable status dates established for 12 such rolls. 13 If satisfied that such organization would otherwise be entitled to 14 such exemption if such organization had acquired the subject property 15 and filed an application for exemption by the appropriate taxable status 16 date, the assessor, upon approval by the Rockland county legislature, 17 may grant exemption from all taxation and make appropriate corrections 18 to the subject rolls. If such exemption is granted and such organiza- 19 tion therefore shall have paid any tax with respect to the subject 20 rolls, the governing body or tax department may, in its sole discretion, 21 provide for the refund of those taxes paid and cancel any taxes, fines, 22 penalties, interest or tax liens remaining unpaid. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15607-03-6